North Dakota, session 69, HB1380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 11-11-37 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
11-11-37. Proceedings of board of county commissioners to be published in official
newspaper or to official website - When published.
The board of county commissioners shall supply to the official newspaper of the county or
publish to the official website of the county a full and complete report of its official proceedings
at each regular and special meeting no later than seven days after the meeting at which the
report is read and approved. TheIf the county publishes in the official newspaper of the county,
the publisher of the official newspaper shall publish the report in the issue of the paper next
succeeding the time of its reception and shall file with the county auditor an affidavit of
publication executed in the proper form.
Page No. 1 25.1057.01000